North Carolina, session 2025, SB180.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Anson County Board of Commissioners shall consist of seven
members elected from seven single-member residency districts. One member shall be elected
from each residency district. No candidate shall be eligible to file for, be elected to, or serve on
the Anson County Board of Commissioners unless the candidate is a qualified voter and resident
of the district in which that candidate seeks to serve. All candidates for election shall be voted on
by all eligible voters in the county. Members shall take office and qualify on the first Monday in
December of the year of election, and the terms of their predecessors shall expire at that same
time. Members shall serve until a successor has been elected and qualified.
SECTION 1.(b) The residency districts required by this section shall be the election
districts used in the 2020 and 2022 elections for the Anson County Board of Commissioners until
revised.
SECTION 1.(c) Chapter 281 of the 1987 Session Laws is repealed.
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 153A-22.1(f), as enacted by Chapter 215 of the 1995 Session
Laws, and as rewritten by S.L. 1998-175, S.L. 2011-126, S.L. 2023-24, and S.L. 2023-30, reads
as rewritten:
"(f) This section applies to Henderson and Moore Johnston, Anson, Henderson, Johnston,
and Moore Counties only."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective the first Monday in December 2026, and
elections in 2026 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
*S180-v-1*